Massachusetts, session 194th, H46.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2DDDDDD the following section:-
Section 2EEEEEE. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Financial Literacy Trust Fund. The fund shall
be administered by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The fund shall be
credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court
and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenues; and
(iii) funds from public and private sources such as gifts, grants and donations to further financial
education and professional development. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to
further appropriation and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not
revert to the General Fund.
of 4

(b) Amounts credited to the fund may be expended without further appropriation by the
commissioner, for purposes related to the instruction of elementary, middle and high school
students on financial literacy, including, but not limited to: (i) development of curricular
materials for the financial literacy framework; and (ii) professional development training,
including the provision of training, seminars, conferences, and materials, for educators to use in
the teaching of financial literacy. In expending amounts credited to the fund, the commissioner
shall prioritize: (i) underserved communities across the commonwealth, including those public
schools or school districts with high concentrations of economically disadvantaged students; and
(ii) schools implementing a financial literacy education program consistent with the standards set
by the department of elementary and secondary education for the first time.
(c) Amounts received from private sources shall be approved by the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education and subject to review before being deposited in the fund to
ensure that pledged funds are not accompanied by conditions, explicit or implicit, on the
implementation of financial literacy education programming that may be detrimental to the
neutral and rigorous teaching of financial literacy or that may unduly influence the direction of
financial literacy education policy. The review shall be made publicly available.
(d) Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner shall report to the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate, the joint committee on education and the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the fund's activity. The report shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) the source and amount of funds received; (ii) the amounts distributed and the purpose of
expenditures from the fund, including but not limited to, funds expended to assist school districts
in implementing financial literacy (iii) any grants provided to institutions of higher education and
other stakeholder organizations; (iv) anticipated revenue and expenditure projections for the next
of 4

year; (v) the number of schools and school districts that have used the fund to implement a new
program or enhance or maintain current programming and (vi) the number of schools and school
districts that applied for, but were not granted, funding. The report shall be publicly available on
the department's website.
SECTION 2. Section 1R of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
(a) Financial literacy standards established pursuant to section 1D shall promote an
understanding of personal finances including, but not limited to: (i) loans; (ii) interest and
interest accrual; (iii) using credit and making investments, risks of various financial instruments
and basic diversification of assets; (iv) online commerce; (v) rights and responsibilities of renting
or buying a home or making other large purchases or investments; (vi) saving, investing and
planning for retirement (vii) the role of banking and financial services; (viii) balancing ledgers
and checkbooks; (ix) state and federal taxes; (x) charitable giving; (xi) evaluating media content,
including online content, that relates to personal finance matters; (xii) saving, investing and
planning for post-secondary education or professional training; (xiii) earning and spending
income, methods of payment, consumer protection, and budgeting; (xiv) protecting and insuring
assets, preventing identity theft and avoiding online scams; and (xv) emerging technologies in
the financial industry, including, but not limited to, a basic understanding of cryptocurrencies,
online commerce and computer stock trading, how to evaluate digital media content relating
personal finance matters and how to recognize risk.
of 4

SECTION 3. Section 1R of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subparagraph (b) by striking out the word “may” and
inserting in place thereof the following word:- shall.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this act shall take effect one full academic year from
enactment.
of 4